Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4095.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-977, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-977. Classroom site fund; local level funds; definitions A. The classroom site fund is established consisting of monies transferred to the fund pursuant to section 37-521, subsection B, section 42-5029, subsection E, paragraph 10 and section 42-5029.02, subsection A and deposited pursuant to section 43-1015. The department of education shall administer the fund.  School districts and charter schools may not supplant existing school site funding with revenues from the fund. All monies distributed from the fund are intended for use at the school site. Teacher compensation distributed pursuant to this section shall supplement, and not supplant, teacher compensation monies from any other sources.  The school district or charter school shall notify each school principal of the amount available to the school by April 15 of each year.  The school district or charter school shall request from the school's principal each school's priority for the allocation of the funds available to the school for each program listed under subsection H of this section. The amount budgeted by the school district or charter school pursuant to this section shall not be included in the allowable budget balance carryforward calculated pursuant to section 15-943.01. B. A school district governing board must adopt a performance based compensation system at a public hearing to allocate funding from the classroom site fund pursuant to subsection A of this section. Individual teacher performance shall be a component of allocation for teacher compensation. C. A school district governing board shall vote on a performance based compensation system that includes the following elements: 1. School district performance and school performance. 2. Individual teacher performance. 3. Measures of academic progress toward the academic standards adopted by the state board of education. 4. Other measures of academic progress. 5. Dropout or graduation rates. 6. Attendance rates. 7. Ratings of school quality by parents. 8. Ratings of school quality by students. 9. The input of teachers and administrators. 10. Approval of the performance based compensation system based on an affirmative vote of at least seventy percent of the teachers who are  eligible to participate in the performance based compensation system. 11. An appeals process for teachers who have been denied performance based compensation. 12. Regular evaluation for effectiveness. D. A  The performance based compensation system shall include teacher professional development programs that are aligned with the elements of the performance based compensation system. E. A school district governing board may modify the elements contained in subsection C of this section and consider additional elements when adopting a performance based compensation system. A school district governing board shall adopt any modifications or additional elements and specify the criteria used at a public hearing. F. Until December 31, 2009, each school district shall develop an assessment plan for its performance based compensation system and submit the plan to the department of education by December 31 of each year. A copy of the performance based compensation system and assessment plan adopted by the school district governing board shall be included in the report submitted to the department of education. G. Monies in the classroom site fund are continuously appropriated, are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations and shall be distributed as follows: 1. By March 30 of each year, the staff of the joint legislative budget committee shall determine a per pupil amount from the fund for the budget year using the estimated statewide weighted count for the current year pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 2, subdivision (a) and based on estimated available resources in the classroom site fund for the budget year adjusted for any prior year carryforward or shortfall. 2. The allocation to each charter school and school district for a fiscal year shall equal the per pupil amount established in paragraph 1 of this subsection for the fiscal year multiplied by the weighted student count for the school district or charter school for the fiscal year pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 2, subdivision (a). For the purposes of this paragraph, the weighted student count for a school district that serves as the district of attendance for nonresident pupils shall be increased to include nonresident pupils who attend school in the school district. H. Monies distributed from the classroom site fund shall be spent for the following purposes: 1. Class size reduction. 2. Teacher compensation, including a base pay and performance pay component. 3. Assessment intervention programs. 4. Teacher development. 5. Dropout prevention programs. 6. Teacher liability insurance premiums. 7. Student support services. I. The school district governing board or charter school shall allocate the classroom site fund monies to include, if possible, the priorities identified by the principals of the schools while ensuring that the monies maximize classroom opportunities and conform to the authorized expenditures identified in subsection A of this section. J. School districts and charter schools that receive monies from the classroom site fund shall submit a report by November 15 of each year to the superintendent of public instruction that provides an accounting of the expenditures of monies distributed from the fund during the previous fiscal year and a summary of the results of district and school programs funded with monies distributed from the fund. The department of education in conjunction with the auditor general shall prescribe the format of the report under this subsection. K. School districts and charter schools that receive monies from the classroom site fund shall receive these monies monthly in an amount not to exceed one-twelfth of the monies estimated pursuant to subsection G of this section, except that if there are insufficient monies in the fund that month to make payments, the distribution for that month shall be prorated for each school district or charter school. The department of education may make an additional payment in the current month for any prior month or months in which school districts or charter schools received a prorated payment if there are sufficient monies in the fund that month for the additional payments.  The state is not required to make payments to a school district or charter school classroom site fund if the state classroom site fund revenue collections are insufficient to meet the estimated allocations to school districts and charter schools pursuant to subsection G of this section. L. The state education system for committed youth shall receive monies from the classroom site fund in the same manner as school districts and charter schools.  The Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind shall receive monies from the classroom site fund in an amount that corresponds to the weighted student count for the current year pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 2, subdivision (b) for each pupil enrolled in the Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind.  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind and the state education system for committed youth are subject to this section in the same manner as school districts and charter schools. M. Each school district and charter school, including school districts that unify pursuant to section 15-448 or consolidate pursuant to section 15-459, shall establish a local level classroom site fund to receive allocations from the state level classroom site fund. The Each local level classroom site fund shall be a budgetary controlled account. Interest charges for any registered warrants for the local level classroom site fund shall be a charge against the local level classroom site fund.  Interest earned on monies in the local level classroom site fund shall be added to the local level classroom site fund as provided in section 15-978. This state shall is not be required to make payments to a school district or charter school local level classroom site fund that are in addition to monies transferred to the state level classroom site fund pursuant to section 37-521, subsection B, section 42-5029, subsection E, paragraph 10 and section 42-5029.02, subsection A. N. Monies distributed from the classroom site fund for class size reduction, assessment intervention and dropout prevention programs shall only be used only for instructional purposes in the instruction function as defined in the uniform system of financial records, except that monies shall not be used for school-sponsored athletics. O. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Assessment intervention" means summer programs, after school after-school programs, before school before-school programs or tutoring programs that are specifically designed to ensure that pupils meet the Arizona academic standards as measured by the statewide assessment prescribed by section 15-741. 2. "Class size reduction" means any maintenance and operations expenditure that is designed to reduce the ratio of pupils to classroom teachers, including the use of persons who serve as aides to classroom teachers. 3. "Student support services" means any expenditure in the student support services function as defined in the uniform system of financial records. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 41-5721, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-5721. Emergency deficiencies correction fund; definition A. The emergency deficiencies correction fund is established consisting of monies transferred from the new school facilities fund established by section 41-5741 and deposited pursuant to section 43-1015.  The division shall administer the emergency deficiencies correction fund and distribute monies in accordance with the rules of the division to school districts for emergency purposes. The division shall not transfer monies from the new school facilities fund if the division, in conjunction with the school facilities oversight board, determines that the transfer will affect, interfere with, disrupt or reduce any capital projects that the board has approved pursuant to section 41-5741. The division shall transfer to the emergency deficiencies correction fund the amount necessary each fiscal year to fulfill the requirements of this section. Within thirty days after transferring monies to the emergency deficiencies correction fund, the division shall report to the director of the joint legislative budget committee and the director of the governor's office of strategic planning and budgeting the amount and source of the transfer.  Monies in the emergency deficiencies correction fund are continuously appropriated and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. B. If the division determines that there are insufficient monies in the emergency deficiencies correction fund to correct an emergency, the school district may correct the emergency pursuant to section 15-907. C. If a school district has an emergency, the school district shall apply to the division for funding for the emergency. The school district's application shall disclose any insurance or building renewal monies available to the school district to pay for the emergency.  Before applying to the division for funding for the emergency, the school district governing board shall issue an emergency declaration or resolution to be eligible for monies from the emergency deficiencies correction fund. D. The division staff shall acknowledge receipt of the school district's application for emergency deficiencies funding in writing within five business days after receiving the application.  The division staff shall include in the written acknowledgement of receipt to the school district any investigative, study or informational requirements from the school district, along with an estimated timeline to complete the requirements, necessary for the division staff to make a decision regarding funding. E. The board shall review all policies and procedures that the division develops to administer this section. F. Monies deposited in the fund pursuant to section 43-1015 shall supplement, not supplant, any existing monies from any other source. F. G. For the purposes of this section, "emergency": 1. Means a serious need for materials, services or construction or expenses that exceeds the school district's adopted budget for the current fiscal year and that seriously threatens the functioning of the school district, the preservation or protection of property or public health, welfare or safety. 2. Includes all of the following: (a) A situation that threatens life services such as adequate water supply, energy and wastewater. (b) A situation in which a school district is under orders from an authority having jurisdiction for an unsafe environment such as the department of environmental quality, the occupational safety and health administration or the state fire marshal. (c) The school district receives a professional and certified assessment showing that one or more facilities or systems are structurally unsafe and directly impact the functions of the school district with no alternative option available. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Repeal Section 43-1011, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by Laws 2021, chapter 411, section 4, is repealed. Sec. 4. Title 43, chapter 10, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 43-1015, to read: START_STATUTE43-1015. Income tax; additional tax rate increment; education A. Subject to subsection B of this section, for taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2026, in addition to the tax rate prescribed by section 43-1011, an additional tax rate increment is imposed and shall be collected. The additional tax rate increment is levied at a rate of three and one-half percent of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income that exceeds: 1. $250,000 for a single person or a married person filing separately. 2. $500,000 for a married couple filing a joint return or a single person who is a head of household. B. Notwithstanding sections 42-1116 and 43-206, the department shall separately account for the revenues collected pursuant to this section and deposit those revenues as follows: 1. Fifty percent in the classroom site fund established by section 15-977. 2. Fifty percent in the emergency deficiencies correction fund established by section 41-5721. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Requirements for enactment; two-thirds vote Pursuant to article IX, section 22, Constitution of Arizona, this act is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature and is effective immediately on the signature of the governor or, if the governor vetoes this act, on the subsequent affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.